Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2642.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6501(a)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6501. Scattering rubbish.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of an offense if he:(1) causes any waste paper, sweepings, ashes, household waste, grass clippings or other landscaping matter, glass, metal, refuse or rubbish, or any dangerous or detrimental substance to be deposited into or upon any road, street, highway, alley or railroad right-of-way, or upon the land of another or into the waters of this Commonwealth;* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718